Montana, session 2025, SB92.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Legislative findings. (1) In 1885 the Montana bar association was
established as voluntary group.
(2) In 1974 the Montana supreme court by court order created the state bar of Montana and made
membership mandatory, requiring lawyers to join and pay dues to the state bar of Montana as condition of their
law license.
(3) Nearly half the states currently have voluntary bar associations that do not require lawyers to
join as condition of their law license.
(4) Article VII, section 2(3), of the Montana constitution provides in part that the Montana supreme
court "may make rules governing appellate procedure, practice and procedure for all other courts, admission to
the bar and the conduct of its members".
(5) The state bar of Montana does not perform the Montana supreme court's constitutional charge
to make rules regarding admission to the bar for lawyers. This function is handled by the attorneys' examining
board, a committee the supreme court appoints pursuant to 37-61-102 and Article VII, section 2(3), of the
Montana constitution.
(6) The state bar of Montana does not perform the supreme court's constitutional charge to make
rules regarding "the conduct of [the bar's] members". This function is handled by the office of disciplinary
counsel, established by the Montana supreme court pursuant to the authority of the judicial branch found in
Article VII, section 2(3), of the Montana constitution.
(7) The Montana constitution does not grant power to the Montana supreme court to require
lawyers to join the state bar of Montana as a condition of their law license.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 92

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 92.1
(8) The state bar of Montana regularly lobbies the Montana legislature on various controversial
issues.
(9) In 2018 the United States supreme court held in Janus v. AFSCME, 585 U.S. 878 (2018), that
the government could not compel government workers to pay union dues and had violated employees' free
speech rights under the first amendment to the United States constitution.
(10) Montana lawyers have the same first amendment right to associate or not associate with
groups, particularly groups that may take positions politically that Montana lawyers may not agree with,
including the personal decision to join the state bar of Montana.
(11) The Montana legislature finds that, consistent with Montana's constitution and the Janus
decision, lawyers should not be forced to join or pay dues to the state bar of Montana as a condition of
practicing law in the state of Montana.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Membership in state bar of Montana voluntary. An attorney admitted
by the supreme court to practice law within the state of Montana may not be compelled to join or pay bar dues
to the state bar of Montana as a condition of licensure.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 2] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 37, chapter 61, part 2, and the provisions of Title 37, chapter 61, part 2,
apply to [sections 1 through 2].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2026.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 92